Utah statutes.
57-10-6.   Utah Coordinate Systems of 1927 and 1983 defined.

For purposes of more precisely defining the Utah Coordinate Systems, the following special publications are adopted:

(1)  For the Utah Coordinate System of 1927, the manual entitled "The State Coordinate Systems (A Manual for Surveyors)," Special Publication No. 235, and "Plane Coordinate Projection Tables for Utah," Special Publication No. 277.  Both manuals are published by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Coast and Geodetic Survey, and provide, in part, the following:

(a) (i)  The "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 North Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the Clarke Spheroid of 1866 having standard parallels at north latitudes 41 degrees 47 minutes and 40 degrees 43 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.

(ii)  The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 40 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.

(iii)  This origin is given the coordinates: x=2,000,000 feet and y=0 feet.

(b) (i)  The "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 Central Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the Clarke Spheroid of 1866 having standard parallels at north latitudes 40 degrees 39 minutes and 39 degrees 01 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.

(ii)  The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 38 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.

(iii)  This origin is given the coordinates: x=2,000,000 feet and y=0 feet.

(c) (i)  The "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 South Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the Clarke Spheroid of 1866 having standard parallels at north latitudes 38 degrees 21 minutes and 37 degrees 13 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.

(ii)  The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 36 degrees 40 minutes north latitude.

(iii)  This origin is given the coordinates: x=2,000,000 feet and y=0 feet.

(2)  For the Utah Coordinate System of 1983, the manual entitled "State Plan Coordinate System of 1983," NOAA Manual NOS NGS 5.  The manual is published by the U.S. Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and provides, in part, the following:

(a) (i)  The "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 North Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the North American Datum of 1983 having standard parallels at north latitudes 41 degrees 47 minutes and 40 degrees 43 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.

(ii)  The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 40 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.

(iii)  This origin is given the coordinates: x or E=500,000 meters and y or N=1,000,000 meters.

(b) (i)  The "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 Central Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the North American Datum of 1983 having standard parallels at north latitudes 40 degrees 39 minutes and 39 degrees 01 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.

(ii)  The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west Greenwich and the parallel 38 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.

(iii)  This origin is given the coordinates: x or E=500,000 meters and y or N=2,000,000 meters.

(c) (i)  The "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 South Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the North American Datum of 1983 having standard parallels at north latitudes 38 degrees 21 minutes and 37 degrees 13 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.

(ii)  The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 36 degrees 40 minutes north latitude.

(iii)  This origin is given the coordinates: x or E=500,000 meters and y or N=3,000,000 meters.



Amended by Chapter 62, 2001 General Session

